Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 5. Educational Television Commission

§§ 9-2-501 through 9-2-503.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1994, ch. 48, § 2.

Cross references. —

For state telecommunications council, see §

9-2-1026

.2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1967, ch. 166, §§ 1, 2, and 3, related to the Wyoming educational television commission.